Wyoming, session 2025, HB0260.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-641 is created to read:

9-1-641. Criminal accountability grant program.

(a) There is created the criminal accountability
grant program. The grant program shall be administered by
the attorney general, who shall establish the application
HB0260

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0522
process and any other requirements of the grant program not
otherwise provided by this section. Grants under this
section shall be awarded to qualifying cities and towns to
offset a portion of the costs associated with criminal
activity and shall be awarded in accordance with the
following factors:

(i) Any increase in actual costs incurred due to
an increase in the number of offenders incarcerated in the
city or town when comparing fiscal year 2022 to the most
recent fiscal year. Increased costs due to an increase in
jail fees assessed by the local sheriff shall not be a
factor under this paragraph;

(ii) The number of violent crimes reported in
the city or town to the Wyoming division of criminal
investigation in the most recent fiscal year using a
national incident-based reporting system. Any city or town
not using a national incident-based reporting system shall
be ineligible to receive a grant under this section;

HB0260

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0522
(iii) The number of fentanyl cases filed for
prosecution and fentanyl seizures within the city or town
in the most recent fiscal year;

(iv) The number of crimes filed for prosecution
against a nonresident in the most recent fiscal year in the
city or town. For purposes of this paragraph, "nonresident"
means a person who has not maintained a permanent residence
in the city or town within the previous year.

(b) The attorney general shall develop an application
process, including required documentation and application
deadlines, for cities or towns to apply for grants under
this section. Any city or town may apply for a grant under
this section pursuant to the application process
established by the attorney general.

(c) The size of the grant awarded to a city or town
shall be based on the amount of criminal activity
established in the factors outlined in subsection (a) of
this section and the demonstrated need of the city or town.
Grants awarded under this section shall be expended only to
offset the actual costs to the city or town of criminal
HB0260

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0522
activity associated with any of the factors established in
subsection (a) of this section. Upon receipt of a grant
application the attorney general shall review the
application and shall rank the application, with not more
than ten (10) cities or towns receiving a grant in any
given fiscal year. No city or town shall receive more than
one (1) grant in a fiscal year.

(d) Not later than October 1, 2026, and each year
thereafter, the attorney general shall submit reports to
the joint judiciary interim committee and the governor
including information on the following, to the extent that
the information is available:

(i) The number of applications that the attorney
general received from cities or towns for grant funding
under this section;

(ii) The number and a description of the grants
that the attorney general awarded to cities or towns under
this section;

HB0260

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0522
(iii) How each city or town that received a
grant under this section used or plans to use the grant to
offset costs.

(e) Cities or towns that received grants under this
section shall cooperate with the attorney general by
providing any information requested by the attorney general
to complete the reports required under subsection (e) of
this section not later than thirty (30) days after
receiving the request.

Section 2.

(a) There is appropriated five million dollars
($5,000,000.00) from the general fund to the attorney
general for purposes of this act for the period beginning
July 1, 2025 and ending June 30, 2026. This appropriation
shall only be used to award grants to cities or towns
pursuant to this act. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2026.
HB0260

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0522

(b) It is the intent of the legislature that the
funding to implement the criminal accountability grant
program in subsection (a) of this section be doubled and
included in the attorney general's standard budget request
submitted under W.S. 9-2-1013.

Section 3. The attorney general shall promulgate all
rules necessary to implement this act.

Section 4.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0260